Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.220

Notice of application for order.

Notice of the application for such order shall be given by publication of the same in a newspaper published in the county in which such homestead is situated, if there be a newspaper published therein, once each week for three successive weeks prior to the hearing of such application, and a copy of such notice shall be served upon the alleged incompetent spouse or domestic partner personally, and upon the nearest relative of such incompetent or disabled spouse or domestic partner other than the applicant, resident in this state, at least three weeks prior to such application being heard, and in case there be no such relative known to the applicant, a copy of such notice shall be served upon the prosecuting attorney of the county in which such homestead is situated; and it is hereby made the duty of such prosecuting attorney, upon being served with a copy of such notice, to appear in court and see that such application is made in good faith, and that the proceedings thereon are fairly conducted.

[ 2008 c 6 s 638; 1987 c 442 s 222; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 5; 1895 c 64 s 27; RRS s 555. Formerly RCW 6.12.310.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.